Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.050

Evaluation and research materials and data on private nonprofit group homes—Availability.

The secretary shall make all of the department's evaluation and research materials and data on private nonprofit group homes available to group home contractors. The department may delete any information from the materials that identifies a specific client or contractor, other than the contractor requesting the materials.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 108.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.